Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-626
Interchange, defined.

Interchange shall mean a grade-separated intersection with one or more turning roadways for travel between any of the highways radiating from and forming part of such intersection.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 122.